Idaho, session 2025, S1197.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. In addition to any other appropriation provided by law,
there is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Police the following amounts
to be expended according to the designated programs and expense classes from
the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026:
FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
I. DIVISION OF IDAHO STATE POLICE:
A. DIRECTOR'S OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $16,800 $16,800
B. CAPITOL PROTECTIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $19,400 $213,500 $232,900
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 3,100 0 3,100
TOTAL $22,500 $213,500 $236,000
C. INVESTIGATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $517,700 $86,200 $827,800 $1,431,700
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 28,900 28,900


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 196,200 0 0 196,200
TOTAL $742,800 $86,200 $827,800 $1,656,800
D. PATROL:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,625,800 $805,200 $3,866,000 $9,297,000
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 35,300 35,300
Hazardous Materials/Waste Enforcement
Fund 13,800 284,400 298,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 458,900 458,900
Federal Grant
Fund 55,700 0 114,800 170,500
TOTAL $5,189,500 $805,200 $4,265,200 $10,259,900
E. LAW ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS:
FROM:
Alcohol Beverage Control
Fund $32,700 $58,800 $91,500
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 4,700 4,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 4,600 0 4,600
TOTAL $42,000 $58,800 $100,800
F. SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,982,800 $542,000 $2,524,800
Idaho Law Enforcement Telecommunications
Fund 233,000 33,000 266,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 23,100 23,100


FOR FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 50,000 0 50,000
TOTAL $2,265,800 $598,100 $2,863,900
G. FORENSIC SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $414,200 $167,400 $111,900 $693,500
Idaho Law Enforcement (Project Choice)
Fund 9,100 9,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,700 1,700
Federal Grant
Fund 408,000 0 0 408,000
TOTAL $833,000 $167,400 $111,900 $1,112,300
DIVISION TOTAL $6,829,800 $3,538,100 $5,878,600 $16,246,500
II. POST ACADEMY:
PEACE OFFICER STANDARDS AND TRAINING ACADEMY:
FROM:
Peace Officers Training
Fund $20,800 $173,200 $194,000
GRAND TOTAL $6,850,600 $3,538,100 $6,051,800 $16,440,500
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary,
the appropriation made to Idaho State Police is hereby reduced by the follow-
ing amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and expense
classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026:
FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
I. CAPITOL PROTECTIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement
Fund $213,500 $213,500


FOR FOR
PERSONNEL OPERATING
COSTS EXPENDITURES TOTAL
II. INVESTIGATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $211,900 $211,900
Federal Grant
Fund 196,200 196,200
TOTAL $408,100 $408,100
III. PATROL:
FROM:
Idaho Law Enforcement
Fund $4,276,800 $715,500 $4,992,300
Federal Grant
Fund 458,900 0 458,900
TOTAL $4,735,700 $715,500 $5,451,200
IV. LAW ENFORCEMENT PROGRAMS:
FROM:
Federal Grant
Fund $4,600 $4,600
V. SUPPORT SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,701,300 $1,701,300
VI. FORENSIC SERVICES:
FROM:
Federal Grant
Fund $402,100 $402,100
GRAND TOTAL $6,849,700 $1,331,100 $8,180,800
SECTION 3. In addition to the appropriation made in Section 1, Chap-
ter 286, Laws of 2024, and any other appropriation provided by law, there
is hereby appropriated to the Idaho State Police, in the Division of Idaho
State Police, in the Patrol Program, an additional $268,100 from the General


Fund to be expended for operating expenditures for the period July 1, 2024,
through June 30, 2025.
SECTION 4. FTP AUTHORIZATION. Notwithstanding any other provision of
law to the contrary, the full-time equivalent position authorization pro-
vided to the Idaho State Police is hereby reduced by seven and sixty-seven
hundredths (7.67) for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026.
SECTION 5. POST COUNCIL REPORTING. The POST Council shall submit a re-
port with recommendations for the future of the POST Academy and peace offi-
cer training in the State of Idaho. As part of this report, the POST Coun-
cil shall include: the consideration of local contribution funding models
to address revenue shortages; consideration of the extension of the contrac-
tual commitment for individuals who receive training from the POST Academy;
the evaluation of mechanisms to increase officer retention; and any other
considerations of the POST Council. The POST Council shall provide this re-
port by no later than December 1, 2025, to the Joint Finance-Appropriations
Committee and Budget and Policy Analysis Division of the Legislative Ser-
vices Office.
SECTION 6. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 7. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, Section 3 of this act shall be in full force and effect on
and after passage and approval, and Sections 1, 2, 4, 5, and 6 of this act
shall be in full force and effect on and after July 1, 2025.